Utah statutes.
9-7-216.   Process and content standards for policy.
(1) (a)  Each library's policy shall be developed under the direction of the
library board, adopted in an open meeting, and have an effective date.  The
library board shall review the policy at least every three years, and a
footnote shall be added to the policy indicating the effective date of the
last review.
(b)  Notice of the availability of the policy shall be posted in a conspicuous
place within the library for all patrons to observe.  The library board may
issue any other public notice it considers appropriate to inform the community
about the policy.
(2)  The policy shall:
(a)  state:
(i)  that it restricts access to Internet or online sites that contain
material described in Section 9-7-215; and
(ii)  how the library board intends to meet the requirements of Section
9-7-215;
(b)  inform patrons that administrative procedures and guidelines for the
staff to follow in enforcing the policy have been adopted and are available
for review at the library; and
(c)  inform patrons that procedures for use by patrons and staff to handle
complaints about the policy, its enforcement, or about observed patron
behavior have been adopted and are available for review at the library.
